sn_ZW/sn_ZW.aff
SFX Q a wisupi a 
SFX Q a wisupo a 
SFX Q a wisuso a 
SFX Q a wisuwe a 
SFX Q a wisuwe-e a 
SFX Q a wisuwo a 
SFX Q a wisuzve a 
SFX Q a wiwe a 
SFX Q a wiwe-e a 
SFX Q a wiwe-eka a 
SFX Q a wiwe-eko a 
SFX Q a wiwe-emo a 
SFX Q a wiwe-epi a 
SFX Q a wiwe-epo a 
SFX Q a wiwe-eso a 
SFX Q a wiwe-esu a 
SFX Q a wiwe-ewe a 
SFX Q a wiwe-ewo a 
SFX Q a wiwe-ezve a 
SFX Q a wiweka a 
SFX Q a wiweko a 
SFX Q a wiwemo a 
SFX Q a wiwepi a 
SFX Q a wiwepo a 
SFX Q a wiweso a 
SFX Q a wiwesu a 
SFX Q a wiwewe-e a 
SFX Q a wiwewo a 
SFX Q a wiwezve a 
SFX Q a wiwo a 
SFX Q a wiwoka a 
SFX Q a wiwoko a 
SFX Q a wiwomo a 
SFX Q a wiwopi a 
SFX Q a wiwopo a 
SFX Q a wiwoso a 
SFX Q a wiwosu a 
SFX Q a wiwowe a 
SFX Q a wiwowe-e a 
SFX Q a wiwozve a 
SFX Q a wizve a 
SFX Q a wizveka a 
SFX Q a wizveko a 
SFX Q a wizvemo a 
SFX Q a wizvepi a 
SFX Q a wizvepo a 
SFX Q a wizveso a 
SFX Q a wizvesu a 
SFX Q a wizvewe a 
SFX Q a wizvewe-e a 
SFX Q a wizvewo a 
PFX D  Y 19 
PFX D 0 a . 
PFX D 0 cha . 
PFX D 0 dza . 
PFX D 0 hwa . 
PFX D 0 ka . 
PFX D 0 kwa . 
PFX D 0 ma . 
PFX D 0 na . 
PFX D 0 nda . 
PFX D 0 pa . 
PFX D 0 ra . 
PFX D 0 rwa . 
PFX D 0 sa . 
PFX D 0 ta . 
PFX D 0 twa . 
PFX D 0 va . 
PFX D 0 wa . 
PFX D 0 ya . 
PFX D 0 zva . 
PFX F  Y 19 
PFX F 0 cho . 
PFX F 0 dzo . 
PFX F 0 hwo . 
PFX F 0 ko . 
PFX F 0 kwo . 
PFX F 0 mo . 
PFX F 0 ndo . 
PFX F 0 no . 
PFX F 0 o . 
PFX F 0 po . 
PFX F 0 ro . 
PFX F 0 rwo . 
PFX F 0 so . 
PFX F 0 to . 
PFX F 0 two . 
PFX F 0 vo . 
PFX F 0 wo . 
PFX F 0 yo . 
PFX F 0 zvo . 
PFX G  Y 18 
PFX G 0 che . 
PFX G 0 dze . 
PFX G 0 e . 
PFX G 0 hwe . 
PFX G 0 ke . 
PFX G 0 kwe . 
PFX G 0 me . 
PFX G 0 nde . 
PFX G 0 ne . 
PFX G 0 pe . 
PFX G 0 re . 
PFX G 0 rwe . 
PFX G 0 se . 
PFX G 0 twe . 
PFX G 0 ve . 
PFX G 0 we . 
PFX G 0 ye . 
PFX G 0 zve . 
PFX H  Y 21 
PFX H 0 a . 
PFX H 0 chi . 
PFX H 0 dzi . 
PFX H 0 hu . 
PFX H 0 hwu . 
PFX H 0 i . 
PFX H 0 ka . 
PFX H 0 ku . 
PFX H 0 mu . 
PFX H 0 ndi . 
PFX H 0 pa . 
PFX H 0 ri . 
PFX H 0 ru . 
PFX H 0 rwu . 
PFX H 0 ti . 
PFX H 0 tu . 
PFX H 0 twu . 
PFX H 0 u . 
PFX H 0 va . 
PFX H 0 wa . 
PFX H 0 zvi . 
PFX I  Y 4 
PFX I 0 cha . 
PFX I 0 chi . 
PFX I 0 ka . 
PFX I 0 no . 
PFX J  Y 4 
PFX J 0 nga . 
PFX J 0 sa . 
PFX J 0 singa . 
PFX J 0 sisa . 
PFX K  Y 3 
PFX K 0 ku . 
PFX K 0 mu . 
PFX K 0 pa . 
