sn_ZW/sn_ZW.dic
amura/AVQ
atsama/AVQ
bambaradza/AVQ
banira/AVQ
batika/AVQ
batya/AVQ
bepetudza/AVQ
bhabhadza/AVQ
bhadhiza/AVQ
bharangadza/AVQ
bhedhura/AVQ
bhibhirisa/AVQ
bhita/AVQ
bhosvonga/AVQ
bhuka/AVQ
bhuya/AVQ
bidyudza/AVQ
bindutsa/AVQ
birisa/AVQ
bobomerwa/AVQ
bomhesa/AVQ
bonya/AVQ
boreka/AVQ
bucha/AVQ
bukira/AVQ
bumudza/AVQ
burika/AVQ
butsa/AVQ
bvanganyuka/AVQ
bvarura/AVQ
bvichuka/AVQ
bvisisa/AVQ
bvongonyora/AVQ
bvotomoka/AVQ
bvujunudza/AVQ
bvumbata/AVQ
bvunda-bvunda/AVQ
bvunyingidza/AVQ
bvururutsa/AVQ
bwadagura/AVQ
bwatira/AVQ
bwendama/AVQ
bwibwinyara/AVQ
bwitudza/AVQ
chacha/AVQ
chacharidza/AVQ
chajisa/AVQ
chambwadza/AVQ
chanyaura/AVQ
chatanura/AVQ
chechenedza/AVQ
chechisa/AVQ
chekera/AVQ
chemera/AVQ
chengudzira/AVQ
chenyengura/AVQ
chereredza/AVQ
cheva/AVQ
chidza/AVQ
chingamidza/AVQ
chira/AVQ
chivirika/AVQ
chokocha/AVQ
choronora/AVQ
chunya/AVQ
da/AVQ
dai/AVQ
damaira/AVQ
danidzira/AVQ
dauka/AVQ
dedemura/AVQ
dekeshura/AVQ
denengura/AVQ
denhudza/AVQ
detsa/AVQ
dhadhamuka/AVQ
dhaiza/AVQ
dhaura/AVQ
dhererwa/AVQ
dhinguka/AVQ
dhirima/AVQ
dhogodheka/AVQ
dhonzera/AVQ
dhumha/AVQ
dhuva/AVQ
diki/AVQ
dimuro/AVQ
dirira/AVQ
dodorodza/AVQ
donderana/AVQ
donzva/AVQ
duduma/AVQ
dumadza/AVQ
dunduvira/AVQ
durungunda/AVQ
dyara/AVQ
dyisa/AVQ
dzadzarisa/AVQ
dzamuka/AVQ
dzatuka/AVQ
dzengeneka/AVQ
dzidzira/AVQ
dzikira/AVQ
dzimbikana/AVQ
dzingaidza/AVQ
dzira/AVQ
dzividza/AVQ
dzokerera/AVQ
dzongera/AVQ
dzudzunga/AVQ
dzungira/AVQ
dzutura/AVQ
dzvatsira/AVQ
dzvinyisisa/AVQ
dzvonyora/AVQ
edhita/AVQ
embedza/AVQ
endesa/AVQ
ereka/AVQ
evhikita/AVQ
fafama/AVQ
fambidzana/AVQ
fandisa/AVQ
faranuka/AVQ
fashaidza/AVQ
fazhaira/AVQ
fefetera/AVQ
femedzeka/AVQ
fendura/AVQ
fenyenya/AVQ
feta/AVQ
feya/AVQ
finhura/AVQ
firirira/AVQ
fofovoka/AVQ
fondodza/AVQ
fongorera/AVQ
foshonora/AVQ
fotyoka/AVQ
fudugura/AVQ
fufuna/AVQ
fugura/AVQ
fukidzira/AVQ
fukusha/AVQ
fumhira/AVQ
fundikira/AVQ
fungaidza/AVQ
funha/AVQ
funzira/AVQ
furatira/AVQ
furota/AVQ
fushanisa/AVQ
futudza/AVQ
fuvisa/AVQ
gabura/AVQ
gadura/AVQ
gagadhika/AVQ
gamha/AVQ
gandura/AVQ
ganisha/AVQ
garisana/AVQ
gavha/AVQ
geresa/AVQ
goba/AVQ
gododza/AVQ
goma/AVQ
gomha/AVQ
gonga/AVQ
gonza/AVQ
guburuka/AVQ
gudura/AVQ
guka/AVQ
gumbata/AVQ
gumbutsa/AVQ
gunda/AVQ
gunhira/AVQ
gurukira/AVQ
gusa/AVQ
guumuka/AVQ
gwadabura/AVQ
gwamba/AVQ
gwanzuka/AVQ
gwayawayisa/AVQ
gwedereka/AVQ
gwendereka/AVQ
gwikwirira/AVQ
hachura/AVQ
hanira/AVQ
hetsura/AVQ
homura/AVQ
humana/AVQ
hwambura/AVQ
hwazhata/AVQ
hwimbura/AVQ
hwirira/AVQ
indirira/AVQ
irika/AVQ
ja/AVQ
jairika/AVQ
janura/AVQ
jejeda/AVQ
jibidika/AVQ
jogododza/AVQ
jongama/AVQ
kabira/AVQ
kadyaira/AVQ
kakachuka/AVQ
kakasa/AVQ
kakawadzana/AVQ
kamura/AVQ
kandidzana/AVQ
kangandika/AVQ
kanha/AVQ
kanyaidza/AVQ
kapuka/AVQ
karanhika/AVQ
karivheta/AVQ
kasvaira/AVQ
katsa/AVQ
kavanjura/AVQ
kekedza/AVQ
kika/AVQ
kiya/AVQ
kobvumara/AVQ
kodoba/AVQ
kohomedza/AVQ
kokomara/AVQ
kokovara/AVQ
kombora/AVQ
konda/AVQ
konhera/AVQ
konzeresa/AVQ
kora/AVQ
koromora/AVQ
koshomora/AVQ
koteka/AVQ
kotsva/AVQ
kozva/AVQ
kuchura/AVQ
kukumuka/AVQ
kumanidza/AVQ
kumhina/AVQ
kundidzira/AVQ
kungura/AVQ
kunyisa/AVQ
kurira/AVQ
kurungira/AVQ
kusva/AVQ
kutunura/AVQ
kuwa/AVQ
kwabvura/AVQ
kwadabura/AVQ
kwakwamuka/AVQ
kwangwamadza/AVQ
kwanisika/AVQ
kwasha/AVQ
kwatidza/AVQ
kwazha/AVQ
kwekesheka/AVQ
kwengeka-kwengeka/AVQ
kwenzera/AVQ
kwetsuka/AVQ
kwidibidza/AVQ
kwinya/AVQ
kwitirika/AVQ
makisa/AVQ
manga/AVQ
manyira/AVQ
maraza/AVQ
mbandidzira/AVQ
mbombera/AVQ
mbumura/AVQ
mbwandira/AVQ
medza/AVQ
menyesa/AVQ
mhanya-mhanya/AVQ
mhedura/AVQ
mhuna/AVQ
minya/AVQ
miza/AVQ
mondera/AVQ
monyongoka/AVQ
muduka/AVQ
murudza/AVQ
mvacharika/AVQ
mwadura/AVQ
mwarakaridza/AVQ
mwaudza/AVQ
mwera/AVQ
mwika/AVQ
n'aimisa/AVQ
namana/AVQ
nana/AVQ
nanazira/AVQ
nangura/AVQ
nata/AVQ
n'aza/AVQ
ndanzura/AVQ
ndereredza/AVQ
ndingindidza/AVQ
nduguka/AVQ
ndurudza/AVQ
nekeshera/AVQ
n'en'enura/AVQ
nenguka/AVQ
netsekana/AVQ
ngarangara/AVQ
ngenga/AVQ
ngomhoka/AVQ
ngotyora/AVQ
ngundumura/AVQ
ngururudza/AVQ
ngwamuka/AVQ
ngwaudza/AVQ
ngwina/AVQ
nhebuka/AVQ
nhitsa/AVQ
nhuhwira/AVQ
ningira/AVQ
ninipisa/AVQ
njakura/AVQ
njayama/AVQ
njenjeda/AVQ
njimura/AVQ
nokora/AVQ
nongerera/AVQ
nonozeka/AVQ
nunuvara/AVQ
nwika/AVQ
nyadzika/AVQ
nyambira/AVQ
nyandanura/AVQ
nyangara/AVQ
nyanyadzira/AVQ
nyara/AVQ
nyatisa/AVQ
nyechereka/AVQ
nyemwezeka/AVQ
nyenyesa/AVQ
nyerere/AVQ
nyetuka/AVQ
nyikura/AVQ
nyinura/AVQ
nyodoka/AVQ
nyongana/AVQ
nyorova/AVQ
nyukuka/AVQ
nyunha/AVQ
nzarwo/AVQ
nzunzuta/AVQ
nzvekaira/AVQ
nzvongama/AVQ
nzwisisa/AVQ
odzvoka/AVQ
omerwa/AVQ
oneka/AVQ
onjoroka/AVQ
osa/AVQ
pabvaira/AVQ
padzaura/AVQ
paikira/AVQ
pakanyura/AVQ
pambadza/AVQ
pambusa/AVQ
pamhidzira/AVQ
pandamba/AVQ
pangana/AVQ
panhira/AVQ
panzirirwei/AVQ
paradzanisa/AVQ
parapadza/AVQ
parutsa/AVQ
pasuka/AVQ
patisa/AVQ
pavhurira/AVQ
pazura/AVQ
pedzisira/AVQ
pemhera/AVQ
pengenuka/AVQ
penyesa/AVQ
peputsa/AVQ
pereta/AVQ
pesenguka/AVQ
petura/AVQ
pfachuka/AVQ
pfanha/AVQ
pfauma/AVQ
pfekechera/AVQ
pfetenura/AVQ
pfidza/AVQ
pfipfira/AVQ
pfochodza/AVQ
pfokocha/AVQ
pfozodza/AVQ
pfudzika/AVQ
pfuira/AVQ
pfukuta/AVQ
pfumbunyikira/AVQ
pfumvumara/AVQ
pfundumadza/AVQ
pfunhura/AVQ
pfupfumura/AVQ
pfupi/AVQ
pfurutsa/AVQ
pfutura/AVQ
pfuwisa/AVQ
pika/AVQ
pimbinyn'ara/AVQ
pinda/AVQ
pinganidza/AVQ
pinimidza/AVQ
pinzanisa/AVQ
pipiritsa/AVQ
piringishana/AVQ
pisika/AVQ
piwa/AVQ
pokonyoka/AVQ
pombonoka/AVQ
pondora/AVQ
poresa/AVQ
posita/AVQ
potseka/AVQ
pudumuka/AVQ
pukunyuka/AVQ
pumhuka/AVQ
pungura/AVQ
punza/AVQ
pupuma/AVQ
puromota/AVQ
puruvuritsa/AVQ
putana/AVQ
putura/AVQ
pwapwadika/AVQ
pwatamisa/AVQ
pweveva/AVQ
pwizhizha/AVQ
rabvuka/AVQ
ragadudza/AVQ
raitira/AVQ
rambana/AVQ
randaura/AVQ
rangarira/AVQ
rapika/AVQ
rashidza/AVQ
ratidza/AVQ
ravidza/AVQ
rebesa/AVQ
regedzeka/AVQ
rekerwa/AVQ
rembedza/AVQ
remudza/AVQ
renjerera/AVQ
rerutsa/AVQ
reya/AVQ
ridibuka/AVQ
rigiduka/AVQ
rimbinyuka/AVQ
rindiza/AVQ
rinzika/AVQ
riritira/AVQ
roedza/AVQ
romora/AVQ
ronzera/AVQ
roroma/AVQ
rotsa/AVQ
rowa/AVQ
rozora/AVQ
rugudura/AVQ
rumbirira/AVQ
rungama/AVQ
rurama/AVQ
ruwa/AVQ
rwarisa/AVQ
sabvura/AVQ
saidzira/AVQ
sakabvura/AVQ
samhuka/AVQ
sanduridza/AVQ
sapota/AVQ
sarura/AVQ
sasira/AVQ
sefa/AVQ
sekesera/AVQ
sendekedza/AVQ
sengura/AVQ
serera/AVQ
seta/AVQ
shadagura/AVQ
shakadzira/AVQ
shambidzika/AVQ
shandarika/AVQ
shanira/AVQ
shapura/AVQ
shata/AVQ
shavira/AVQ
shekeya/AVQ
shevedza/AVQ
shigida/AVQ
shinyira/AVQ
shishisa/AVQ
shizhira/AVQ
shona/AVQ
shonyoka/AVQ
shopera/AVQ
shotesa/AVQ
shumira/AVQ
shunya-shunya/AVQ
shurudzira/AVQ
shwabura/AVQ
shweta/AVQ
siira/AVQ
simbirwa/AVQ
simukira/AVQ
sininika/AVQ
sitata/AVQ
soboda/AVQ
sonanidza/AVQ
songorisa/AVQ
sosotedza/AVQ
sukira/AVQ
suma/AVQ
sundidzirana/AVQ
sungirira/AVQ
sunika/AVQ
surudzira/AVQ
suruvara/AVQ
suta/AVQ
svakutsa/AVQ
svatama/AVQ
svavisa/AVQ
sverereka/AVQ
sveveredza/AVQ
svikika/AVQ
svipa/AVQ
svisvidza/AVQ
svodogora/AVQ
svonda/AVQ
svoresa/AVQ
svovesa/AVQ
svunudza/AVQ
swa/AVQ
swededza/AVQ
swiswita/AVQ
tadza/AVQ
taimuza/AVQ
takanyika/AVQ
takwira/AVQ
tambira/AVQ
tamira/AVQ
tandabvuka/AVQ
tandavadza/AVQ
tangira/AVQ
tanhaura/AVQ
tanyura/AVQ
tapita/AVQ
taranga/AVQ
taridzira/AVQ
tasanudza/AVQ
tatamura/AVQ
tatira/AVQ
tazura/AVQ
tegemura/AVQ
teketeza/AVQ
tendenedza/AVQ
tengera/AVQ
tepfenudza/AVQ
teta/AVQ
tetsura/AVQ
tibuka/AVQ
timba/AVQ
tinhimara/AVQ
tita/AVQ
todzera/AVQ
tondoroka/AVQ
torika/AVQ
tsakatika/AVQ
tsanhura/AVQ
tsaudzira/AVQ
tsemura/AVQ
tserera/AVQ
tsikinura/AVQ
tsindimara/AVQ
tsirima/AVQ
tsokonyora/AVQ
tsonyombora/AVQ
tsuma/AVQ
tsuramira/AVQ
tsvairisa/AVQ
tsvedzemudza/AVQ
tsverenzvera/AVQ
tsvinyira/AVQ
tsvukirisa/AVQ
tubura/AVQ
tukuma/AVQ
tunaidza/AVQ
tunhidzwa/AVQ
turikira/AVQ
tutumira/AVQ
twa/AVQ
tyityidza/AVQ
udzisira/AVQ
undita/AVQ
unura/AVQ
utsa/AVQ
vakiridza/AVQ
vangarara/AVQ
vauka/AVQ
vengana/AVQ
vezera/AVQ
vharavhanyura/AVQ
vhenya/AVQ
vhindinuka-vhindinuka/AVQ
vhiza/AVQ
vhukutika/AVQ
vhundusa/AVQ
vhutisa/AVQ
vindinura/AVQ
vonesa/AVQ
wadzanyura/AVQ
wanzisa/AVQ
wawata/AVQ
wisa/AVQ
worora/AVQ
yambuka/AVQ
yavaya/AVQ
yerekana/AVQ
zama/AVQ
zazambura/AVQ
zengurira/AVQ
zhavirira/AVQ
zhozhota/AVQ
zivika/AVQ
zuika/AVQ
zuruka/AVQ
zvengesa/AVQ
zvimiririra/AVQ
zvomoka/AVQ
zwika/AVQ
